data/sources/glossaries/co/raw/apertium-cos.cos.dix
    <pardef n="loc/u__n">
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hi</l><r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="spezi/a__n">
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="puet/a__n">
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Bibbia__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="nordu__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     
    </pardef>
    
        <pardef n="re__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="attric/e__n">
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

<pardef n="om/u__n">
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ini</l><r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

<pardef n="ghjorn/u__n">
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Proper nouns -->

    <pardef n="ecc/.__abbr">
      <e><p><l>.</l><r>.<s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>.</l><r>.<s n="abbr"/><j/>.<s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="C.__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Jaume__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Maria__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="Colonna__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

	<pardef n="Corsica__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

	<pardef n="Aiacciu__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

<pardef n="Caraibi__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>
    
    
    
      <pardef n="FLNC__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="CIA__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

<pardef n="Beatles__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>




    <!-- SECTION: Adjectives -->

    <pardef n="molt/u__adj">
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="poc/u__adj">
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hi</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>he</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="terz/u__adj">
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mo__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="pos"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="soi/u__adj">
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
 
    <pardef n="nostr/u__adj">
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  
    <pardef n="bislingu/u__adj">
      <e r="LR"><p><l></l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bastiacc/iu__adj">
      <e><p><l>iu</l><r>iu<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ia</l><r>iu<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>iu<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ii</l><r>iu<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ie</l><r>iu<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="vechj/u__adj">
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
 
    <pardef n="tipic/u__adj">
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hi</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>he</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
      
    
  


<pardef n="gran__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="maior/e__adj">
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l><r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="naziunal/e__adj">
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="maiò__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tal__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="uccidental/i__adj">
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l><r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- SECTION: Adverbs -->

    <pardef n="parchè__adv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="quandu__rel">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="rel"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="omu"><i>om</i><par n="om/u__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rè"><i>rè</i><par n="re__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ghjornu"><i>ghjorn</i><par n="ghjorn/u__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fondu"><i>fond</i><par n="ghjorn/u__n"/></e>
    <e lm="attrice"><i>attric</i><par n="attric/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prigione" r="LR"><p><l>prigiò</l><r>prigione</r></p><par n="Bibbia__n"/></e>
    <e lm="linia"><i>lini</i><par n="spezi/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="inchiesta"><i>inchiest</i><par n="spezi/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="risicu"><i>risic</i><par n="loc/u__n"/></e>
    <e lm="punenti"><i>punenti</i><par n="nordu__n"/></e>
    <e lm="livanti"><i>livanti</i><par n="nordu__n"/></e>
    <e lm="puema"><i>puem</i><par n="puet/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lezzione" r="LR"><p><l>lezziò</l><r>lezzion</r></p><par n="Bibbia__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nemicu"><i>nemic</i><par n="loc/u__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prugramma"><i>prugramm</i><par n="puet/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Isabella"><i>Isabella</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Alberta"><i>Alberta</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Benjamin"><i>Benjamin</i><par n="Colonna__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Mark"><i>Mark</i><par n="Jaume__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Maro"><i>Maro</i><par n="Jaume__np"/></e>
    <e lm="I."><i>I.</i><par n="C.__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Q."><i>Q.</i><par n="C.__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Fughjuchja"><i>Fughjuchja</i><par n="Corsica__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Ghjucatoghju"><i>Ghjucatoghju</i><par n="Aiacciu__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Calcutta"><i>Calcutta</i><par n="Corsica__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Haiti"><i>Haiti</i><par n="Aiacciu__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Guéant"><i>Guéant</i><par n="Colonna__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Stati uniti d'America"><i>Stati<b/>uniti<b/>d'America</i><par n="Caraibi__np"/></e>
     <e lm="Caraibi"><i>Caraibi</i><par n="Caraibi__np"/></e>
     <e lm="IRA"><i>IRA</i><par n="CIA__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Piazzetta"><i>Piazzetta</i><par n="CIA__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Instagram"><i>Instagram</i><par n="FLNC__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Daesh"><i>Daesh</i><par n="FLNC__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Muvrini"><i>Muvrini</i><par n="Beatles__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Chjami Aghjalesi"><i>Chjami<b/>Aghjalesi</i><par n="Beatles__np"/></e>
    <e lm="gran"><i>gran</i><par n="gran__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="altru"><i>altr</i><par n="molt/u__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="antru"><i>antr</i><par n="molt/u__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="pocu"><i>poc</i><par n="poc/u__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tal"><i>tal</i><par n="tal__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="mo" r="LR"><p><l>meiu</l><r>mo</r></p><par n="mo__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="to" r="LR"><p><l>tuo</l><r>to</r></p><par n="mo__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="so" r="LR"><p><l>soi</l><r>so</r></p><par n="soi/u__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="nostru"><i>nostr</i><par n="nostr/u__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="vostru"><i>vostr</i><par n="nostr/u__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sicondu" r="LR"><p><l>second</l><r>sicond</r></p><par n="terz/u__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="terzu"><i>terz</i><par n="terz/u__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="bislinguu"><i>bislingu</i><par n="bislingu/u__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="monulinguu"><i>monulingu</i><par n="bislingu/u__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="vicinu"><i>vicin</i><par n="vechj/u__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="benefiziariu"><i>benefiziari</i><par n="vechj/u__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="bastiacciu"><i>bastiacc</i><par n="bastiacc/iu__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="siguente"><i>siguent</i><par n="maior/e__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="maiore"><i>maior</i><par n="maior/e__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="immurtale"><i>immurtal</i><par n="naziunal/e__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="maiò"><i>maiò</i><par n="maiò__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="megliu"><i>megliu</i><par n="maiò__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="custruttibile"><i>custruttibil</i><par n="naziunal/e__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="cinematograficu"><i>cinematografic</i><par n="tipic/u__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="pacificu"><i>pacific</i><par n="tipic/u__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sittintriunali"><i>sittintriunal</i><par n="uccidental/i__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="cumu"><i>cumu</i><par n="parchè__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="cum'è" r="LR"><p><l>cume</l><r>cum'è</r></p><par n="quandu__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="ecc."><i>ecc</i><par n="ecc/.__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="sec."><i>sec</i><par n="ecc/.__abbr"/></e>
